Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 4 Federal Elective Officers

17-4-1.
Congressional districts.

The state shall be divided into two (2) districts for the election of representatives in the congress of the United States, to be called respectively the first congressional district and the second congressional district, and the electors residing in each of the districts who are qualified to vote for general officers shall be entitled, at the times and places and in the manner provided by law, to elect a representative in the congress of the United States for the district in which they reside.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 838, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1912, ch. 775, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 15, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1932, ch. 1859, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 322, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-1

; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-4-2.
Territory in first and second congressional districts.

It is understood and intended that for the purpose of this section a line described as running on, on, to or through any street (including road, avenue, lane, way, parkway, expressway, divided Highway, state route or interstate route, or trail), stream or river, is intended to mean the centerline of that street, stream or river, and a line described as the shoreline is intended to mean the line on the mean low water level, and a feature extension is intended to mean the imaginary straight-line extension from the end of a map feature, usually a street or road, to another feature as for example, from the end of a dead-end street to a nearby river, in all instances, unless the same shall be otherwise specified.

It is further understood and intended that for the purpose of this section, the districts described in this section shall be composed of United States census geography (tracts and blocks), as defined by the 2020 version of the “TIGER” files from the United States Census Bureau, whose boundaries correspond to the below metes and bounds set forth in this section and hereby made a part of this chapter. A listing of which census blocks are contained within each district shall be deemed to be incorporated by reference.

It is further understood and intended that for the purpose of this section, the districts will be depicted on thirty-nine (39) maps known as Congress Plan B, compiled by Election Data Services, Inc. for each city and town, and hereinafter may be referred to as town maps.

The secretary of state shall keep a copy of each set of the foregoing maps and a copy of the census tract and block listing available for inspection during ordinary business hours at his or her office. The secretary of state shall furnish each city and town a copy of the town map covering that particular city or town within ten (10) days from the date of passage of this act.

For purposes of this title, references to “tract” or “CT” shall mean “census tract,” as that demographic unit is established by the United States Bureau of the census for the 2020 census as described by maps and publications of the bureau. References to “block,” “blocks,” or “block groups,” refer to those demographic units as established by the United States Census Bureau for the 2020 census as described by maps and publications of the bureau.

Any reference to a “city or town,” “city or town boundaries,” or “city or town limits” shall refer to the boundaries or limits of the particular city or town as defined by the 2020 version of the “TIGER” files from the United States Census Bureau.

In the census tract and block listing, the first two (2) digits of a census description shall refer to the State of Rhode Island (44), the next three (3) digits of a census description shall refer to the county in which the district lies. Bristol county carries the code 001; Kent county carries the code 003; Newport county carries the code 005; Providence county carries the code 007 and Washington county carries the code 009. The next six (6) digits refer to the census tract within the county set forth in the description. The last four (4) digits refer to the census block within the census tract. “TIGER” is an acronym for the computer readable geographic data base that automates the mapping and related geographic activities required to support the United States’ Census Bureau’s census and survey programs and stands for “Topologically Integrated Geographic Encoding and Referencing.”

If any census tract, block, block group, or enumeration district is omitted, listed more than once, or is only partially provided for, it is intended that the districts be defined in such a manner as to not omit any area of Rhode Island from a district and to comply with the standard of Article I, Section 2 of the United States Constitution requiring that districts be reasonably equal. In order to carry out the intent of the general assembly as expressed in this section the secretary of state shall, if necessary, undertake measures to insure compliance with this section.

In the event of a discrepancy between the metes and bounds description, the description by census tracts and blocks, and the maps which shall be on file with the secretary of state, then the listing of census tracts and blocks shall take precedence and be controlling.

First district: The first congressional district shall consist of all of the towns of: North Smithfield; Smithfield; Lincoln; Cumberland; North Providence; Barrington; Warren; Bristol; Portsmouth; Tiverton; Little Compton; Middletown; and Jamestown and the cities of: Woonsocket; Central Falls; Pawtucket; East Providence; and Newport.

The first congressional district shall also consist of all of the part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Providence — North Providence boundary line and State Route 146; thence southerly on State Route 146 to Branch Ave; thence westerly on Branch Ave to Moy St; thence southerly on Moy St to Concannon St; thence westerly on Concannon St to Douglas Ave; thence southeasterly on Douglas Ave to Veazie St; thence southeasterly on Veazie St to Eva St; thence southerly on Eva St to Admiral St; thence easterly on Admiral St to Douglas Ave; thence southerly on Douglas Ave to Berkshire St; thence northeasterly on Berkshire St to March St; thence southeasterly on March St to Chad Brown St; thence northeasterly on Chad Brown St to census block 440070027003019; thence southeasterly on the line between census blocks 440070027003019 — 440070027003020 and 440070027003019 — 440070027003021 to Fillmore St; thence southwesterly on Fillmore St to Douglas Ave; thence southeasterly on Douglas Ave to Chalkstone Ave; thence northeasterly on Chalkstone Ave to N Davis St; thence southerly on N Davis St to Douglas Ave; thence southeasterly on Douglas Ave to I-95; thence southerly on I-95 to Smith St; thence easterly on Smith St to Francis St; thence southerly on Francis St to Gaspee St; thence easterly on Gaspee St to the eastern boundary line of Providence Amtrak Station and the New York New Haven and Hartford RR; thence northerly on New York New Haven and Hartford RR to Smith St; thence easterly on Smith St to the Moshassuck River; thence southerly on the Moshassuck River to Washington Pl; thence southwesterly on Washington Pl to Memorial Blvd; thence southeasterly on Memorial Blvd to Dyer St; thence southerly on Dyer St to Eddy St; thence southeasterly on Eddy St to Elm St; thence southwesterly on Elm St to Richmond St; thence northwesterly on Richmond St to Ship St; thence westerly on Ship St to Clifford St; thence southwesterly on Clifford St to Chestnut St; thence northwesterly on Chestnut St to census block 40070008003072; thence northeasterly and northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 40070008003072 — 440070008003067 to Weybosset St; thence southwesterly on Weybosset St to Broad St; thence southwesterly on Broad St to I-95; thence southeasterly on I-95 to US Hwy 6; thence easterly on US Hwy 6 to Eddy St; thence southerly on Eddy St to Blackstone St; thence westerly on Blackstone St to Friendship St; thence southwesterly on Friendship St to Broad St; thence northerly on Broad St to Trinity Sq; thence southwesterly on Trinity Sq to Bridgham St; thence northwesterly on Bridgham St to Cranston St; thence southwesterly on Cranston St to Chapin Ave; thence westerly on Chapin Ave to Messer St; thence southerly on Messer St to Wendell St; thence westerly on Wendell St to Service Rd 1; thence southerly on Service Rd 1 to Union Ave; thence westerly on Union Ave to State Highway 10; thence southerly on State Highway 10 to the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence southerly and easterly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to the New York, New Haven and Hartford RR; thence northeasterly on the New York, New Haven and Hartford RR to Elmwood Ave; thence southeasterly on Elmwood Ave to Linden Ave; thence easterly and southerly on Linden Ave to Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd; thence northeasterly on Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd to Park Path; thence northeasterly on Park Path to Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd; thence northeasterly, southerly, and easterly on Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd to Montgomery Ave; thence easterly on Montgomery Ave to the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence easterly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to the Providence — East Providence boundary line; thence northerly on the Providence — East Providence boundary line to the Providence — Pawtucket boundary line; thence westerly on the Providence — Pawtucket boundary line to the Providence — North Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Providence — North Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

Second district: The second congressional district shall consist of all of the towns of: Burrillville; Glocester; Foster; Scituate; Johnston; Coventry; West Warwick; West Greenwich; East Greenwich; Exeter; North Kingstown; Narragansett; New Shoreham; South Kingstown; Charlestown; Richmond; Hopkinton; and Westerly and the cities of: Cranston and Warwick.

The second congressional district shall also consist of all of the part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Providence — North Providence boundary line and State Route 146; thence southerly on State Route 146 to Branch Ave; thence westerly on Branch Ave to Moy St; thence southerly on Moy St to Concannon St; thence westerly on Concannon St to Douglas Ave; thence southeasterly on Douglas Ave to Veazie St; thence southeasterly on Veazie St to Eva St; thence southerly on Eva St to Admiral St; thence easterly on Admiral St to Douglas Ave; thence southerly on Douglas Ave to Berkshire St; thence northeasterly on Berkshire St to March St; thence southeasterly on March St to Chad Brown St; thence northeasterly on Chad Brown St to census block 440070027003019; thence southeasterly on the line between census blocks 440070027003019 — 440070027003020 and 440070027003019 — 440070027003021 to Fillmore St; thence southwesterly on Fillmore St to Douglas Ave; thence southeasterly on Douglas Ave to Chalkstone Ave; thence northeasterly on Chalkstone Ave to N Davis St; thence southerly on N Davis St to Douglas Ave; thence southeasterly on Douglas Ave to I-95; thence southerly on I-95 to Smith St; thence easterly on Smith St to Francis St; thence southerly on Francis St to Gaspee St; thence easterly on Gaspee St to the eastern boundary line of Providence Amtrak Station and the New York New Haven and Hartford RR; thence northerly on New York New Haven and Hartford RR to Smith St; thence easterly on Smith St to the Moshassuck River; thence southerly on the Moshassuck River to Washington Pl; thence southwesterly on Washington Pl to Memorial Blvd; thence southeasterly on Memorial Blvd to Dyer St; thence southerly on Dyer St to Eddy St; thence southeasterly on Eddy St to Elm St; thence southwesterly on Elm St to Richmond St; thence northwesterly on Richmond St to Ship St; thence westerly on Ship St to Clifford St; thence southwesterly on Clifford St to Chestnut St; thence northwesterly on Chestnut St to census block 40070008003072; thence northeasterly and northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 40070008003072 — 440070008003067 to Weybosset St; thence southwesterly on Weybosset St to Broad St; thence southwesterly on Broad St to I-95; thence southeasterly on I-95 to US Hwy 6; thence easterly on US Hwy 6 to Eddy St; thence southerly on Eddy St to Blackstone St; thence westerly on Blackstone St to Friendship St; thence southwesterly on Friendship St to Broad St; thence northerly on Broad St to Trinity Sq; thence southwesterly on Trinity Sq to Bridgham St; thence westerly and northwesterly on Bridgham St to Cranston St; thence southwesterly on Cranston St to Chapin Ave; thence westerly on Chapin Ave to Messer St; thence southerly on Messer St to Wendell St; thence westerly on Wendell St to Service Rd 1; thence southerly on Service Rd 1 to Union Ave; thence westerly on Union Ave to State Highway 10; thence southerly on State Highway 10 to the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence southerly and easterly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to the New York, New Haven and Hartford RR; thence northeasterly on the New York, New Haven and Hartford RR to Elmwood Ave; thence southeasterly on Elmwood Ave to Linden Ave; thence easterly and southerly on Linden Ave to Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd; thence northeasterly on Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd to Park Path; thence northeasterly on Park Path to Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd; thence northeasterly, southerly, and easterly on Fredrick C. Greene Memorial Blvd to Montgomery Ave; thence easterly on Montgomery Ave to the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence westerly, southerly and northerly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to the Providence — Johnston boundary line; thence northerly on the Providence — Johnston boundary line to the Providence — North Providence boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Providence — North Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 5, § 5, effective February 16, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 6, § 5, effective February 16, 2022.

17-4-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 838, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 16, § 2; P.L. 1912, ch. 775, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 15, § 2; P.L. 1930, ch. 1527, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1859, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 322, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-3

; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 84, § 2; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 21, effective June 28, 2002. For present comparable provisions, see §

17-4-2

.

17-4-4.
Time of election of representatives in congress.

The election of representatives in congress shall be held on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in each even numbered year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 838, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 16, § 3; P.L. 1914, ch. 1048, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 15, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 322, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-4

; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-4-5.
Time of election of senators.

The election of a senator in congress shall be held on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November, in the year 1958, and on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in every sixth year thereafter, and on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in the year 1960, and on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in every sixth year thereafter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 16, § 3; P.L. 1914, ch. 1048, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 15, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 322, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-5

; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-4-6.
Manner of voting — Election by plurality.

In all elections of senators and representatives in congress the voting shall be in accordance with the provisions of chapter 19 of this title, and the person or candidate receiving the largest number of votes shall be declared elected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 838, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 16, § 4; P.L. 1914, ch. 1048, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 15, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 322, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-6

; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-4-7.
New election in absence of plurality.

In case no person receives a plurality of the votes cast in the state or in either congressional district at any election, a new election shall be held in the state or in the district on the fourth (4th) Tuesday after the holding of the election at which there was no choice. For the election, any new certificates of nomination or nomination papers shall be filed ten (10) days previous to the date of the election.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 838, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 16, § 7; P.L. 1914, ch. 1048, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 15, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 322, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-8

; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-7

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-4-8.
Special election to fill vacancy in office of representative.

Whenever any person elected a representative in congress from either district, at any time between the day of his or her election and the beginning of his or her term of office, refuses to serve and so declares to the secretary of state, or dies, becomes insane, removes from the state, or is otherwise incapacitated, or whenever a vacancy happens in the representation of this state in congress as contemplated in the second section of the first article of the Constitution of the United States, the governor shall immediately issue his or her writ of election directed to the several city and town clerks, or local boards as the case may be, ordering a new election of the representative in congress to be held in that district to fill the vacancy, at as early a date, to be stated in the writ, as will be in compliance with the provisions of law in relation to these elections, but no election provided for by this section shall be held on any day other than the first Tuesday next after the first Monday of any month; provided, that whenever a vacancy occurs between the first day of April and the first day of October in any even-numbered year, the governor shall, unless in his or her opinion the public good requires an earlier special election, issue his or her writ for a special election to fill the vacancy to be held with the general election on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November of that year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 838, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 16, § 8; P.L. 1914, ch. 1048, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 15, § 8; P.L. 1930, ch. 1529, § 1; P.L. 1936 (s.s.), ch. 2455, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 322, § 7; G.L. 1956, § 17-3-9; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 182, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 279, § 3.

17-4-9.
Special election to fill senatorial vacancy.

Whenever a person elected a senator in congress, at any time between the day of that person’s election and the beginning of his or her term of office, refuses to serve and so declares to the secretary of state, or dies, becomes insane, removes from the state, or is otherwise incapacitated, or whenever a vacancy happens in the representation of this state in the United States senate, the governor shall issue his or her writ of election directed to the several city and town clerks, or local boards as the case may be, ordering a new election of senator to fill the vacancy to be held in the state at as early a date, to be stated in the writ, as will be in compliance with the provisions of law in relation to these elections, but no election provided for by this section shall be held on any day other than the first Tuesday next after the first Monday of any month; provided, that whenever a vacancy occurs between the first day of July and the first day of October in any even-numbered year, the governor shall, unless in his or her opinion the public good requires an earlier special election, issue his or her writ for a special election to fill the vacancy to be held with the general election on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November of that year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 16, § 8; P.L. 1914, ch. 1048, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 15, § 8; P.L. 1930, ch. 1529, § 1; G.L. 1936, ch. 15, § 9; P.L. 1936 (s.s.), ch. 2455, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 322, § 8; G.L. 1956, § 17-3-10; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 182, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 279, § 3.

17-4-10.
Presidential electors — Time and manner of voting — Election by plurality.

The people of this state, qualified by law to vote for general offices, shall elect as many electors of president and vice-president of the United States that the state is or shall be entitled to at town, ward, and district meetings on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November, in every fourth (4th) year, commencing in 1960, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 19 of this title, and the several candidates having a plurality of the legal votes given in at the election shall be elected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 827, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 1917, ch. 1507, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 16, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 323, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-1

; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-1

0; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-4-11.
Meeting of electors — Vacancies.

Presidential electors elected pursuant to this chapter shall meet in the state house in the city of Providence on the first Monday after the second Wednesday in December after their election, at the hour of 12 o’clock noon of that day, and if there is any vacancy in the office of electors, occasioned by death, refusal to act, neglect to attend, or other cause, the electors present shall immediately proceed to fill, by roll call and by a plurality of votes, the vacancy in the electoral college; and when the electors appear, or the vacancy is filled as provided in this section, they shall proceed to perform the duties required of electors by the Constitution and laws of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 827, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 17, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 16, § 6; P.L. 1929, ch. 1407, § 1; G.L. 1936, ch. 16, § 5; P.L. 1936 (s.s.), ch. 2439, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 323, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-3

; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-11

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-4-12.
Attendance of governor and secretary of state — Certificates required by federal law.

It shall be the duty of the governor and the secretary of state to be present at the state house in Providence on the day of the meeting of the electors, to make and furnish to the electors any certificates required by the laws of the United States to be forwarded to the seat of government with the votes of the electors which are made necessary by any election made pursuant to the provisions of §

17-4-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 827, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 17, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 16, § 8; redesignated § 6 by P.L. 1936 (s.s.), ch. 2439, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 323, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-4

; G.L. 1956, §

17-4-12

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.